Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-216
Children of members in military service; children of parents employed by federal government and living on property of national parks; residency.

In all cases when any person is on active duty as a member of the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, or Air Force in the State of Nebraska and is residing on federally owned property, any child of school age of such active duty member who also resides on such property shall be considered a resident of the school district where such property is located and may be admitted pursuant to subsection (1) of section 79-215.

This section also applies to children of parents employed by the federal government and residing with their parents on the property of national parks or national monuments within this state.

Laws 1937, c. 185, § 1, p. 742;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-521;

R.S.1943, § 79-518;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 85, p. 721;

Laws 1959, c. 390, § 1, p. 1345;

Laws 1967, c. 533, § 1, p. 1767;

Laws 1971, LB 292, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 839, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-446;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 20;

Laws 2019, LB115, § 2.

Military personnel living off and on air base are part of population of county. Ludwig v. Board of County Commissioners of Sarpy County, 170 Neb. 600, 103 N.W.2d 838 (1960).